Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6846YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 804.21, subsections 2 and 4, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. Where When the offense is bailable, the magistrate 3 shall fix bail giving due consideration to the bail at the 4 amount endorsed on the warrant or unless the bail set on the 5 warrant is less than that specified on the bond schedule, and 6 shall give due consideration to other conditions stipulated on 7 the warrant for the defendantâs appearance in the court which 8 that issued the warrant; if such person is not released on 9 bail, the magistrate must redeliver the warrant to the officer, 10 and the officer shall retain custody of the arrested person 11 until the personâs removal to appear before the magistrate who 12 issued the warrant. 13 b. In fixing bail, the magistrate shall not set bail at 14 an amount that is less than, or a percentage of, that on 15 the uniform bond schedule, unless the magistrate provides 16 justification for the deviation in writing. 17 4. a. When the court is not in session, a person arrested 18 and placed in jail may be released on the personâs own 19 recognizance with or without other conditions, by the verbal 20 or written order of a judge or magistrate. The verbal order 21 may be communicated by telephone. The judge or magistrate 22 may issue such order of release only upon the request of an 23 attorney or person believed by the judge or magistrate to be 24 reliable. 25 b. A defendant is only eligible to be released on the 26 defendantâs own recognizance if the defendant has been charged 27 with a nonviolent, nondrug simple or serious misdemeanor. 28 Sec. 2. Section 804.21, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 29 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 b. The bond schedule shall not be used unless both the 31 following conditions are met: 32 (1) The if the person was arrested for a crime other than a 33 violation of section 708.6 , section 724.26, subsection 1 , or 34 a forcible felony , and 35 -1- LSB 6846YC (1) 91 as/js 1/ 4 H.F. _____ (2) The courts are not in session . 1 Sec. 3. Section 811.1, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 2 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 All Except as provided in subsection 3, all defendants 4 are bailable both before and after conviction, by sufficient 5 surety, or subject to release upon condition or on their own 6 recognizance, except that the following defendants shall not be 7 admitted to bail: 8 Sec. 4. Section 811.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. A defendant is only eligible to be 11 released on the defendantâs own recognizance if the defendant 12 has been charged with a nonviolent, nondrug simple or serious 13 misdemeanor. 14 Sec. 5. Section 811.2, subsection 1, paragraph a, 15 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 All bailable defendants shall be ordered released from 18 custody pending judgment or entry of deferred judgment on 19 their personal recognizance , except as limited by section 20 811.1, subsection 3 , or upon the execution of an unsecured 21 appearance bond in an amount specified by the magistrate unless 22 the magistrate determines in the exercise of the magistrateâs 23 discretion, that such a release will not reasonably assure the 24 appearance of the defendant as required or that release will 25 jeopardize the personal safety of another person or persons. 26 When such determination is made, the magistrate shall, either 27 in lieu of or in addition to the above methods of release, 28 impose the first of the following conditions of release which 29 that will reasonably assure the appearance of the person 30 for trial or deferral of judgment and the safety of other 31 persons, or, if no single condition gives that assurance, any 32 combination of the following conditions: 33 Sec. 6. Section 811.2, subsection 1, paragraph a, 34 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -2- LSB 6846YC (1) 91 as/js 2/ 4 H.F. _____ (3) Require the execution of an appearance bond in a 1 specified amount and the deposit with the clerk of the district 2 court or a public officer designated under section 602.1211, 3 subsection 4 , in cash or other qualified security, of a sum not 4 to exceed ten percent of the amount of the bond, the deposit to 5 be returned to the person who deposited the specified amount 6 with the clerk upon the performance of the appearances as 7 required in section 811.6 . 8 Sec. 7. Section 811.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 9 by adding the following new paragraph: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. If a pretrial release evaluation is 11 completed by the department of corrections for a magistrate to 12 consider prior to the release of a defendant, the evaluator 13 for the department of corrections must verify all of the 14 information contained in the pretrial release evaluation prior 15 to providing it to the magistrate. 16 Sec. 8. JUDICIAL COUNCIL ââ UNIFORM BOND SCHEDULE. The 17 judicial council shall revise and update the bond schedule to 18 adjust for inflation since the previous update that became 19 effective on July 1, 2017. The revised bond schedule shall be 20 submitted to the supreme court no later than July 1, 2027. 21